Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.220

Commodity boards—Membership—Marketing agreement or order to establish and control—Director votes.

(1) Every marketing agreement and order shall provide for the establishment of a commodity board of not less than five nor more than thirteen members and shall specify the exact number thereof and all details as to (a) qualification, (b) nomination, (c) election or appointment by the director, (d) term of office, and (e) powers, duties, and all other matters pertaining to such board.

(2) The members of the board shall be producers or handlers or both in such proportion as the director shall specify in the marketing agreement or order, but in any marketing order or agreement the number of handlers on the board shall not exceed the number of producers thereon. The marketing order or agreement may provide that a majority of the board be appointed by the director, but in any event, no less than one-third of the board members shall be elected by the affected producers.

(3) In the event that the marketing order or agreement provides that a majority of the commodity board be appointed by the director, the marketing order or agreement shall incorporate the provisions of RCW 15.65.243 for board member selection.

(4) The director shall appoint to every board one member who represents the director. The director shall be a voting member of each commodity board.

[ 2003 c 396 s 9; 2002 c 313 s 20; 1961 c 256 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.